Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1417
Reports to commission; form.

Each public institution may file with the commission a copy of any report filed with any other state agency. The filing shall be either in an electronic format compatible with the commission's computer system or a paper copy. A public institution may respond to any requests for information from the commission by providing the commission with the exact location of the information within a report that has previously been filed with the commission.

Laws 1999, LB 816, § 18.